Nevada, session 83, SB476.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Peace Officers’ Standards and Training Commission the
sum of $87,360 for the replacement of computer hardware and
associated software.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Peace Officers’ Standards and Training Commission the
sum of $92,433 for the costs of updating a records management and
tracking system.
Sec. 3. Any remaining balance of the appropriations made by
sections 1 and 2 of this act must not be committed for expenditure
after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made
or any entity to which money from the appropriation is granted or
otherwise transferred in any manner, and any portion of the
appropriated money remaining must not be spent for any purpose
after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money
was appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the fund from which
it was appropriated on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)